Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Registration Requirements, Procedures, and Certificates.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, § 108.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 74, 75.

Sec. 18.50.150.
Form of certificate.

The form of certificates, reports, and other returns required by this chapter, or by regulations adopted under it, must include as a minimum the items recommended by the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics subject to approval of any modification by the state registrar.
The bureau shall prescribe and furnish forms.

History.

(§ 12 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 18.50.160.
Birth registration.

A certificate of birth for each live birth that occurs in the state shall be filed with the bureau, as provided in this section, within five days after the birth. When a birth occurs on a moving conveyance within the United States and the child is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the birth shall be registered in this state and the place where the child is first removed shall be considered the place of birth. When a birth occurs on a moving conveyance in international waters, international air space, a foreign country, or a foreign country’s air space and the child is first removed from the conveyance in this state, the birth shall be registered in this state but the certificate shall show the actual place of birth if the place can be determined.

When a birth occurs in or en route to an institution, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative of the person in charge of the institution shall obtain the personal data, prepare the certificate, certify that the child was born alive at the place and time and on the date stated either by signature on the certificate or another certification process, including an electronic process, approved by the bureau, and file the certificate as directed in (a) of this section. The physician or other person in attendance shall provide the medical information required by the certificate within 72 hours after the birth.

When a birth occurs outside an institution, the certificate shall be prepared and filed by one of the following in the indicated order of priority:

the physician in attendance at or immediately after the birth; or, in the absence of a physician,

a person other than a parent in attendance at or immediately after the birth; or

a parent; or, if a parent is unable,

the person in charge of the premises where the birth occurs.

If the mother was married at conception, during the pregnancy, or at birth, the name of the husband shall be entered on the certificate as the father of the child unless

paternity has been lawfully determined otherwise by a tribunal, in which case the name of the father, if determined by a tribunal, shall be entered; or

both the mother and the mother’s husband execute affidavits attesting that the husband is not the father and that another man is the father, and the mother and the other man execute affidavits attesting that the other man is the father, so long as the affidavits meet the requirements of (g) of this section.

If the mother was not married at conception, during the pregnancy, or at birth, the name of the father may not be entered on the certificate of birth unless

paternity has been lawfully determined by a tribunal, in which case the name of the father, if determined by the tribunal, shall be entered;

both the mother and the man to be named as the father have executed affidavits attesting that that man is the father, so long as the affidavits meet the requirements of (g) of this section and AS

18.50.165

; or

otherwise specified by statute.

In the case of a child born out of wedlock, the certificate of birth shall be filed in accordance with (a), (b), and (c) of this section unless the state registrar directs another procedure.

An affidavit under (d) or (e) of this section must meet the following requirements:

the affidavit must be executed by all required individuals; an affidavit may be executed jointly, individually, or in combination of jointly and individually; and

if an affidavit is executed by more than one individual, the signature of each individual must be individually notarized.

In this section, unless the context requires otherwise, “tribunal” means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity authorized by law to determine parentage.

History.

(§ 13 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 83 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 28 ch 37 SLA 1986; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 3, 4 ch 46 SLA 1997; am § 20 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was reparagraphed for clarity in 1994 and the punctuation was changed correspondingly.

Cross references. —

For duty of certified midwife to comply with this section, see
AS

08.65.140

.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.162.
Notification about hearing screening.

When the bureau receives a certificate of live birth under AS

18.50.160

for a newborn who was delivered outside of a hospital, the bureau shall forward the names and addresses of the parents to the department employees who administer the screening program set out in AS

47.20.310

—

47.20.390

. Those department employees shall notify the child’s parents of the merits of having the child screened for hearing ability.

History.

(§ 4 ch 43 SLA 2006)

Sec. 18.50.165.
Acknowledgement of paternity; forms.

The state registrar shall prepare a form for use in acknowledging paternity under AS

25.20.055

. The form must comply with the minimum requirements of 42 U.S.C. 652(a)(7). The form must include

a statement that the man who signs the form is acknowledging that the man is the natural father of the child named in the form and that the man assumes the parental duty of support of that child;

the address and social security number of both parents of the child named in the form;

signature lines for both parents;

a signature line for either a witness or notary public; and

a statement that

sets out the legal consequences to and the rights and responsibilities of the mother and the man acknowledging paternity of signing the form, including

if one of the parents is a minor, any rights given due to minority status;

legal alternatives to signing the form; and

the legal responsibility that arises from signing the form;

the mother and the man acknowledging paternity have been notified that, unless fraud, duress, or material mistake of fact is shown in accordance with AS

25.20.050

, the acknowledgment may only be rescinded by the earlier of the following dates:

60 days after the date of the person’s signature; or

the date of initiation of an administrative or judicial procedure to establish support of the child in which the person is a party; and

the mother and the man acknowledging paternity have read and understand the contents of the form.

The registrar shall distribute copies of the form prepared under (a) of this section to each hospital in the state, to each physician in the state whose practice includes attendance at births, to each certified nurse midwife and certified direct-entry midwife in the state, and to each other interested person in the state who requests copies of the form.

[Repealed, § 148 ch 87 SLA 1997.]

The state registrar shall keep on file all forms acknowledging paternity that are submitted to the registrar under AS

25.20.055

.

An acknowledgment of paternity that met the requirements of state law at the time that the acknowledgment was made in this state is not ineffective due to changes in the form for acknowledgment occurring after the date that the acknowledgment was made.

An acknowledgment of paternity affidavit or form executed in another state meeting that state’s legal requirements shall be considered in this state as if the affidavit or form was executed in compliance with this section.

The registrar shall offer voluntary acknowledgment of paternity services by making available technical assistance about the form described in this section. Upon request, the registrar shall provide oral assistance to parents wishing to complete the form.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1994; am §§ 21, 22, 148 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 2012; am § 34 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (b), substituted “certified nurse midwife” for “nurse-midwife” and inserted “certified” preceding “direct-entry”.

Sec. 18.50.170.
Foundling registration.

The person who assumes the custody of a living infant of unknown parentage shall within seven days report the information prescribed by the state registrar on a form and in the manner prescribed by the state registrar to the local registrar of the registration district in which the child was found.

The place where the child was found shall be entered as the place of birth and the date of birth shall be determined by approximation.

A report registered under this section constitutes the certificate of birth for the infant.

If the child is identified and a certificate of birth is found or obtained, a report registered under this section shall be sealed and filed in accordance with instructions of the state registrar, and may be opened only by order of a superior court or as provided by regulation.

History.

(§ 14 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Sec. 18.50.180.
Delayed registration of birth.

When the birth of a person born in the state has not been registered, a certificate may be filed in accordance with regulations adopted under this chapter. The certificate shall be registered subject to the evidentiary requirements the department prescribes by regulation to substantiate the alleged facts of birth.

When the birth occurred more than seven days but less than one year before the application for registration, the birth may be filed with the proper local registrar in accordance with regulations adopted under this chapter.

When the birth occurred one year or more before the application for registration, the birth shall be filed on a form prescribed by the bureau, and shall be submitted to the bureau for registration. The state registrar may accept the certificate for registration when the evidence required by regulation is submitted to substantiate the facts of birth. A certificate registered under this subsection shall be marked “delayed.”

When the birth occurred 12 years or more before the application for registration, the certificate of birth shall be prepared on a form entitled “delayed certificate of birth.” The information provided on this form shall be subscribed and sworn to by the person whose birth is to be registered before an official authorized to administer oaths. When a person is not competent to swear to this information it shall be subscribed and sworn to by a parent, legal guardian, or the person’s representative. The form must provide for the name and sex of the person whose birth is to be registered; the place and date of birth; and other information required by the bureau. When the certificate is submitted, the state registrar shall add a description and an abstract of each document submitted in support of the delayed registration. The original delayed certificate of birth shall be filed with the bureau.

The state registrar shall accept the registration if the applicant was born in the state and if the applicant’s sworn statements are established to the satisfaction of the state registrar by the necessary evidence established by regulation. The items necessary to be substantiated, the type of documents acceptable as evidence, the number of necessary documents, and the form and content of the description and abstract of each document to be added to the certificate shall be prescribed by regulation. In general they shall follow the national standards recommended by the agencies responsible for national vital statistics and for the use of records in the interest of national security. The state registrar may make exceptions when necessary by reducing the number of documents required for delayed filings by Indians, Eskimos and Aleuts, natives of the state, if the state registrar is otherwise satisfied with the validity of the application.

When the applicant does not submit documentation required in support of the applicant’s statements or when the state registrar finds reason to question the validity or adequacy of the certificate or the supporting evidence, the state registrar may not accept the delayed certificate of birth and shall advise the applicant of the reasons for this action, and of the applicant’s right of appeal to the superior court. The bureau may provide for the dismissal of an application that is not actively prosecuted.

History.

(§ 15 a-f ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.190.
Delayed registration of death or marriage.

When a death or marriage occurring in the state has not been registered, a certificate may be filed in accordance with regulations adopted under this chapter. The certificate shall be registered subject to evidentiary requirements prescribed by the department by regulation to substantiate the alleged facts of death or marriage.
Certificates of death and marriage registered one year or more after the date of occurrence shall be marked “delayed.”

History.

(§ 15 g ch 118 SLA 1960)

Sec. 18.50.200.
Judicial procedure to establish facts of birth.

If a delayed certificate of birth is not accepted under AS

18.50.180

, a petition may be filed with the superior court for an order establishing a record of the date and place of birth of the person.

The petition shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the bureau, and must contain the following statements, sworn to by the petitioner:

that the person for whom a delayed certificate of birth is sought was born in the state;

that no record of birth of the person can be found in the bureau or in the files of the local custodian of birth records;

that diligent efforts by the petitioner have failed to obtain the necessary evidence to file a delayed certificate with the bureau;

that the state registrar has refused to register a delayed certificate of birth;

other statements and information as may be required.

The petition shall be accompanied by a statement of the state registrar made in accordance with AS

18.50.180(f)

and all documentary evidence that was submitted to the bureau in support of the registration.

The court shall fix a time and place for hearing the petition, and the state registrar shall be given 15 days’ notice of the hearing. The state registrar or an authorized representative may appear and testify in the proceeding.

If the court from the evidence presented finds that the person for whom a delayed certificate of birth is sought was born in the state, it shall make findings as to the place and date of birth, and other findings the petition requires and shall issue an order on a form prescribed and furnished by the bureau to establish a record of birth. This order must include the birth data to be registered, a description of the evidence presented in the manner prescribed under AS

18.50.180

, and the date of the court’s action, and shall be marked as a court order.

The clerk of the superior court shall forward each order to the bureau before the 11th day of the calendar month following the month in which it was entered. The bureau shall register the order and the order constitutes the record of birth. Copies of the record of birth may be issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 16 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.210.
Court reports of adoption.

For each adoption decreed by a court in the state, the court shall require the preparation of a report of adoption on a form prescribed and furnished by the bureau. The report must include the facts necessary to locate and identify the original certificate of birth, if any, of the person adopted. If the person being adopted was born in the state, the report must provide information necessary to establish a new certificate of birth. If the person being adopted was born outside the United States, the report must provide findings, if requested by the adoptive parents, or other information necessary to establish a certificate of birth. The report must identify the order of adoption, and be certified by the court or the clerk.

The petitioner or the attorney for the petitioner shall furnish with the petition for adoption information in the possession of the petitioner necessary to prepare the adoption report. The social welfare agency or other person concerned shall supply the court with additional information necessary to complete the report if the information is in the possession of the agency or the person. The furnishing of the information is a prerequisite to the issuance of a final decree in the matter.

Whenever an adoption decree is amended or vacated, the court shall prepare a report on a form prescribed and furnished by the bureau. The report must include the facts necessary to identify the original adoption report and the facts amended in the adoption decree necessary to properly amend the original report, or the new certificate of birth if already established.

Before the 11th day of each calendar month, the court shall forward to the bureau reports of decrees of adoption, including those vacated or amended, that were entered in the preceding month, together with the related reports the bureau requires.

When the bureau receives a report of an adoption, or vacation or amendment of an adoption from a court for a person born in the United States but outside the state, a copy shall be made for the bureau’s files and the original shall be forwarded to the appropriate registration authority in the state of birth.

History.

(§ 17 ch 118 SLA 1960; am §§ 1, 2 ch 76 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 18.50.211.
Certificate of birth for foreign-born adopted person.

The state registrar shall issue a certificate of birth for a person born outside the United States whose adoptive parents are residents of the state at the time of the adoption, upon request by the adopted person, or by the adopted person’s adoptive parent or guardian that the certificate be made, and upon receipt of an adoption report as provided in AS

18.50.210

together with

the information necessary to identify the original certificate of birth; or

if there is no original certificate of birth, the findings of the court under AS

25.23.175

, unless the adoption proceeding is commenced before August 31, 1982, in which case an affidavit of an adoptive parent setting out the true or probable date and place of birth and parentage of the adopted person must accompany the adoption report.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 14 SLA 1995.]

A certificate of birth issued under this section shall be in a form prescribed by the state registrar and shall state that it is not evidence of United States citizenship.

Upon proof of naturalization an amended certificate of birth shall be issued under this section that deletes the statement that the certificate is not evidence of United States citizenship.

History.

(§ 3 ch 76 SLA 1982; am §§ 1, 2 ch 14 SLA 1995)

Sec. 18.50.220.
New certificate of birth.

The state registrar shall establish a new certificate of birth for a person born in the state, upon proper request that the certificate be made, and upon receipt of

an adoption report as provided in AS

18.50.210

, or a certified copy of the decree of adoption from a court of competent jurisdiction in another state, together with the information necessary to identify the original certificate of birth and to establish the new certificate of birth; however, a new certificate of birth may not be established if so requested by the court decreeing the adoption, the adoptive parents, or the adopted person if the adopted person is of legal age; or

the evidence required by law and regulation proving that the person has been legitimated.

When a new certificate of birth is established, the actual place and date of birth shall be shown. The new certificate shall be substituted for the original certificate of birth, and

thereafter, in the case of an adoption, the original certificate and the evidence of adoption are not subject to inspection except as provided in AS

18.50.500

—

18.50.510

or by order of the superior court under AS

25.23.150

, but the state registrar shall allow inspection by an agent of the state or federal government acting in the performance of the agent’s official duties; in the case of a legitimation, the original certificate and the evidence of legitimation are not subject to inspection except upon order of the superior court or as provided by regulation; however, the regulation shall allow inspection by an agent of the state or federal government acting in the performance of the agent’s official duties;

upon receipt of a report that an adoption has been vacated, the original certificate of birth shall be restored to its place in the files and the new certificate and evidence are not subject to inspection except upon order of a superior court.

If no certificate of birth is on file for the person for whom a new certificate is to be established under this section, a delayed certificate of birth shall be filed with the bureau as provided in this chapter before a new certificate of birth may be established.

When a new certificate of birth is established by the state registrar, the state registrar shall direct the disposition of and substitution for all copies of the original certificate of birth in the custody of a local registrar of vital statistics or other local custodian of the records. When an adoption has been vacated, the state registrar shall instruct the local officials as to a necessary action.

History.

(§ 18 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 140 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A proposed administrative regulation providing for issuance of a new birth certificate upon establishment of a tribal custom adoption would be valid. Feb.15, 1990, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.50.225.
Birth certificates suitable for display.

In addition to another birth certificate issued under this chapter, the state registrar shall issue, on request and payment of a fee of $25, a birth certificate representing that the birth of the person named on the certificate is recorded in the office of the registrar. The fee required under this subsection is in addition to a fee required under AS

18.50.330

for a copy of a birth certificate.

The certificate issued under (a) of this section must be in a form consistent with the need to protect the integrity of vital records and must be suitable for display. It may bear the seal of the state and may be signed by the governor.

A certificate issued under (a) of this section has the same status as evidence as an original birth certificate.

The estimated amount by which the fees received under this section exceed the cost of issuing birth certificates under (a) of this section may be appropriated annually by the legislature to the Alaska children’s trust grant account (AS

37.14.205

).

History.

(§ 1 ch 31 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 90 SLA 1991; am E.O. No. 96 § 2 (1996); am § 1 ch 115 SLA 2010)

Sec. 18.50.230.
Death registration; disclosure for child support purposes.

A death certificate for each death that occurs in the state shall be filed with the local registrar of the registration district in which the death occurred within three days after death and before final disposition of the body or removal of the body from the state, except as provided by regulation in special problem cases. For the purpose of this section, if the place of death is unknown, a death certificate shall be filed in the registration district in which the dead body is found. When a death occurs on a moving conveyance a death certificate shall be filed in the registration district in which the dead body is first removed from the conveyance.

The funeral director or person acting as the funeral director who first assumes custody of a dead body shall file the death certificate. The funeral director or the person acting as the funeral director shall obtain the personal data from the next of kin or the best qualified person or source available and the medical certification of cause of death from the person responsible for this information.

The medical certification shall be completed and signed within 24 hours after death by the physician in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition that resulted in death except when an official inquiry or inquest is required and except as provided by regulation in special problem cases.

When a death occurs without medical attendance, or when official inquiry is required, the department shall provide by regulation, in accordance with law, the responsibility for completing and signing the medical certification. This subsection is intended to include, among others, cases involving a medical examiner and cases involving presumption of death.

To assist the Alaska Court System to remove the names of deceased persons from jury lists under AS

09.20.050(c)

, the state registrar of vital statistics shall forward to the administrative director of the Alaska Court System the names of persons for whom certificates of death were issued and reported to the registrar.

A death certificate issued under this section must include the decedent’s social security number, if ascertainable. Upon request, the registrar shall provide a decedent’s social security number to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 19 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 92 SLA 1989; am § 10 ch 103 SLA 1996; am § 23 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (f) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For duty of certified midwife to comply with this section, see
AS

08.65.140

.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 18.50.235.
Certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth.

After a stillbirth occurs in the state, the person required to file a fetal death registration under AS

18.50.240(b)

shall advise the mother and, if the father is present, the father

that the parent may request the preparation of a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth;

that the parent may obtain a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth by contacting the bureau; and

of the contact information for the bureau.

A parent who requests a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth may provide a name for placement on the certificate. If a name is not provided, the bureau shall cause the certificate to show either “baby boy” or “baby girl,” as appropriate, and the last name of the parent who requested the certificate. The name provided on the certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth must be the same name as the name on the fetal death certificate.

A certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth must include the state file number of the corresponding fetal death certificate.

The department shall prescribe the form and content of a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth to record the birth and specify the information required to prepare the certificate.

A certificate issued under this section is not proof of a live birth, and the certificate must contain the phrase “not proof of live birth.” The bureau may not use a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth to calculate live birth statistics.

A parent may request that the bureau issue a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth regardless of the date on which the certificate of fetal death was issued.

The department may adopt regulations needed to implement this section.

In this section,

“fetal death” has the meaning given in AS

18.50.950

;

“stillbirth” means a fetal death that resulted in the issuance of a fetal death certificate under AS

18.50.240

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 8 SLA 2009)

Sec. 18.50.240.
Fetal death registration.

A fetal death certificate for each fetal death that occurs in the state shall be filed with the local registrar of the registration district in which the delivery occurred within three days after the delivery and before final disposition of the fetus or removal of the fetus from the state, except as provided by regulation in special problem cases. However, the filing of a certificate for a product of a pregnancy of less than 20 weeks may be determined by regulation. For the purposes of this section, if the place of fetal death is unknown, a fetal death certificate shall be filed in the registration district in which the dead fetus is found. When a fetal death occurs on a moving conveyance a fetal death certificate shall be filed in the registration district in which the fetus is first removed from the conveyance.

The funeral director or person acting as the funeral director who first assumes custody of a fetus shall file the fetal death certificate. In the absence of a funeral director or a person acting as a funeral director, the physician or other person in attendance at or after the delivery shall file the certificate of fetal death. The person who files the certificate shall obtain the personal data from the next of kin or the best qualified person or source available and the medical certification of cause of death from the person responsible for this information.

The medical certification shall be completed and signed within 24 hours after delivery by the physician in attendance at or after delivery except when an official inquiry or inquest is required and except as provided by regulation in special problem cases.

When a fetal death occurs without medical attendance upon the mother at or after the delivery, or when official inquiry is required, the department shall provide by regulation, in accordance with law, the responsibility for completing and signing the medical certification.

History.

(§ 20 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Cross references. —

For duty of certified midwife to comply with this section, see
AS

08.65.140

.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 18.50.245.
Report of induced termination of pregnancy.

A hospital, clinic, or other institution where an induced termination of pregnancy is performed in the state shall submit a report directly to the state registrar within 30 days after the induced termination is completed. The report may not contain the name of the patient whose pregnancy was terminated but must contain the information required by the state registrar in regulations adopted under this section.

When an induced termination of pregnancy is performed by a physician outside of a hospital, clinic, or other institution, the physician shall submit the report required under this section within 30 days after the induced termination of pregnancy is completed.

For purposes of this section,

an induced termination of pregnancy is considered to be performed where the act interrupting the pregnancy is performed even if the resultant expulsion of the product of conception occurs elsewhere;

prescription of a medicine by a physician who knows that the medicine will be taken with the intention of inducing termination of a pregnancy is considered to be the act that interrupts the pregnancy even if the medicine is taken outside of the physician’s presence; and

an induced termination of pregnancy is considered to be completed when the product of conception is extracted or expulsed.

The state registrar shall annually prepare a statistical report based on the reports received under this section. The report must include the types of information required under (e) of this section, except that the statistical report may not identify or give information that can be used to identify the name of any physician who performed an induced termination of pregnancy, the name of any facility in which an induced termination of pregnancy occurred, or the name of the municipality or community in which the induced termination of pregnancy occurred. The data gathered from the reports received under this section may only be presented in aggregate statistics, not individually, so that specific individuals may not be identified. After preparation of the annual report, the state registrar shall destroy the reports received under this section.

The state registrar shall adopt regulations to implement this section. The regulations that establish the information that will be required in a report of an induced termination of pregnancy

must require information substantially similar to the information required under the United States Standard Report of Induced Termination of Pregnancy, as published by the National Center for Health Statistics, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, United States Department of Health and Human Services, in April 1998, as part of DHHS Publication No. (PHS) 98-1117;

must require, if known, whether the unidentified patient requested and received a written copy of the information required to be maintained on the Internet under AS

18.05.032

; and

may not include provisions that would violate a woman’s privacy by requiring the woman’s name or any identifying information in the report.

History.

(§ 1 ch 141 SLA 2002; am § 6 ch 178 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 18.50.250.
Permits.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, the funeral director or person acting as the funeral director who first assumes custody of a dead body or fetus shall obtain a burial-transit permit before final disposition or removal from the state of the body or fetus and within 72 hours after death, except as otherwise authorized by regulation for special problem cases.

The local registrar of the registration district where the death occurred shall issue a burial-transit permit when a certificate of death or fetal death has been filed in accordance with this chapter, except as otherwise authorized by regulation in special problem cases.

A burial-transit permit that accompanies a dead body or fetus brought into the state is authority for final disposition of the body or fetus in the state.

A permit for disinterment and reinterment is required before disinterment of a dead body or fetus except as authorized by regulation or otherwise provided by law. Upon proper application the permit shall be issued by the local registrar of vital statistics in accordance with instructions of the state registrar.

The state medical examiner shall obtain the burial-transit permit before a body is transported under AS

12.65.025(a)(2)

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 118 SLA 1960; am §§ 3, 4 ch 96 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 18.50.260.
Extension of time.

By regulation and upon the conditions it prescribes to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter, the department may provide for the extension of the periods prescribed in AS

18.50.160

and

18.50.230

—

18.50.250

for the filing of birth certificates, death certificates, fetal death certificates, medical certifications or causes of death, and for the obtaining of permits, in cases in which compliance with the applicable prescribed period would result in undue hardship.

Regulations may provide for the issuance of a burial-transit permit under AS

18.50.250

before the filing of a certificate of death or fetal death upon conditions designed to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter in a case in which compliance with the requirement that the certificate be filed before the issuance of the permit would result in undue hardship.

History.

(§ 22 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 18.50.270.
Marriage registration.

A certificate of marriage for each marriage performed in the state shall be filed with the local registrar of vital statistics of the registration district in which the marriage was performed within seven days of the marriage.

The official who issues the marriage license shall prepare the certificate of marriage on forms prescribed and furnished by the bureau, as specified elsewhere in the statutes and in regulations adopted under this chapter.

A person who performs a marriage shall complete the forms as specified elsewhere in the statutes or in regulations adopted under this chapter, and shall file the original certificate of marriage with the local registrar.

An official issuing a marriage license shall report to the state registrar before the 11th day of each calendar month, on forms prescribed and furnished by the bureau, the information required concerning each marriage license issued during the preceding month.

History.

(§ 23 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 18.50.272.
Heirloom certificates of marriage suitable for display.

In addition to a certificate of marriage issued under this chapter, the state registrar shall issue, on request and payment of a fee established by regulation, an heirloom certificate of marriage representing the marriage of the persons named on the certificate of marriage that is recorded in the office of the registrar.

The department shall adopt regulations that establish the amount of the fee for each design of an heirloom certificate of marriage. Notwithstanding AS

37.10.050(a)

, each fee shall be set at an amount that is more than the estimated actual costs to the department, not to exceed the estimated fair market value of a comparable artistic rendition. The fee required under this subsection is in addition to any fee established under AS

18.50.330

for a copy of a certificate of marriage.

The certificate issued under (a) of this section must be in a form consistent with the need to protect the integrity of vital records and must be suitable for display. It may bear the seal of the state and may be signed by the governor.

An heirloom certificate of marriage issued under (a) of this section has the same status as evidence as an original certificate of marriage filed under AS

18.50.270

.

The estimated amount by which the fees received under this section exceed the cost of issuing heirloom certificates of marriage under (a) of this section may be appropriated annually by the legislature to the Alaska children’s trust grant account (AS

37.14.205

).

History.

(§ 1 ch 84 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 115 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.